Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1666HH (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 160 Section 1. Section 48A.7A, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. a. If a person registers to vote under this section at 3 a polling place that has access to an electronic poll book, 4 the precinct election official shall verify against a database 5 maintained by the state commissioner that the person has not 6 been convicted of a felony or, if the person has been convicted 7 of a felony, the person has had the personâs voting rights 8 restored. If the precinct election official determines that 9 the person has not been convicted of a felony or has been 10 convicted of a felony but the personâs voting rights have been 11 restored, the precinct election official shall furnish a ballot 12 to the voter. If the database indicates that the person has 13 been convicted of a felony and that the personâs voting rights 14 have not been restored, the precinct election official shall 15 challenge the person under section 49.79 . 16 b. If a A person who registers to vote under this section 17 at a polling place that does not have access to an electronic 18 poll book, the person shall be permitted to cast a provisional 19 ballot under section 49.81 , and the absentee and special voters 20 precinct board, appointed pursuant to section 53.23 , shall 21 verify against a database maintained by the state commissioner 22 that the person has not been convicted of a felony or, if the 23 person has been convicted of a felony, the personâs voting 24 rights have been restored. If information in the database 25 indicates that the person has not been convicted of a felony 26 or, if the person has been convicted of a felony, the personâs 27 voting rights have been restored, the voterâs provisional 28 ballot shall be counted. If the database indicates that the 29 person has been convicted of a felony and the personâs voting 30 rights have not been restored, the voterâs provisional ballot 31 shall be rejected. 32